Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska15-275
Offstreet parking; revenue from onstreet parking meters; use.

Any city of the primary class is authorized to use any or all of the revenue from onstreet parking meters for the purpose set forth in section 15-270 if such revenue has not been pledged for the payment of revenue bonds authorized by the provisions of sections 15-269 to 15-276.

Laws 1967, c. 51, § 7, p. 187.